dictsource/shn_rules
// Shan (Tai Yay) pronunciation rules (Burmese script)

.group င // U+1004
         င         N

.group တ // U+1010
         တ         t

.group ထ // U+1011
         ထ         t_h

.group ပ // U+1015
         ပ         p

.group မ // U+1019
         မ         m

.group ယ // U+101A
         ယ         j

.group ရ // U+101B
         ရ         R

.group လ // U+101C
         လ         l

.group ဝ // U+101D
         ဝ         w

.group သ // U+101E
         သ         s

.group ဢ // U+1022
         ဢ         ?

.group ၵ // U+1075
         ၵ         k

.group ၶ // U+1076
         ၶ         k_h

.group ၸ // U+1078
         ၸ         tS;

.group ၺ // U+107A
         ၺ         J

.group ၼ // U+107C
         ၼ         n

.group ၽ // U+107D
         ၽ         p_h

.group ၾ // U+107E
      _) ၾ         p_h       // Except for Eastern dialects, which use 'f'.
         ၾ         f

.group ႁ // U+1081
         ႁ         h
